Colorado, session 2026A, HB1231.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Physical therapists licensed pursuant to article 285 of title 12,
Colorado Revised Statutes, are health-care professionals who complete
graduate-level education and clinical training in the evaluation of the
musculoskeletal, neuromuscular, cardiovascular, and pulmonary systems;
(b) Preparticipation physical examinations for interscholastic
athletic activities are intended to assess a student's physical readiness to
safely participate in an athletic activity and identify potential risk factors
for injury or illness;
(c) Licensed physical therapists are trained and qualified to
perform evaluations of strength, flexibility, balance, endurance,
functional movement, and cardiovascular response to physical activity
and to make appropriate participation determinations consistent with their
scope of practice;
(d) The bylaws of the Colorado High School Activities
Association currently require a physical examination and written medical
clearance for participation in interscholastic athletics and permit such
clearance to be provided by licensed physicians, physician assistants,
advanced practice registered nurses, nurse practitioners, and
chiropractors; and
(e) Permitting licensed physical therapists to perform
preparticipation physical examinations and provide written clearance for
interscholastic athletic activities increases access to timely care for
-2- HB26-1231

students and families without compromising student safety.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-32-116.5, add
(6.5) as follows:
22-32-116.5. Extracurricular and interscholastic activities -
definitions.
(6.5) IF A STATEWIDE HIGH SCHOOL ACTIVITIES ASSOCIATION
REQUIRES A PHYSICAL EXAMINATION AND WRITTEN CLEARANCE FROM A
HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER BEFORE A STUDENT MAY PLAY OR PARTICIPATE
IN A TEAM ATHLETIC ACTIVITY, THE STATEWIDE HIGH SCHOOL ACTIVITIES
ASSOCIATION SHALL PERMIT A PHYSICAL THERAPIST LICENSED PURSUANT
TO ARTICLE 285 OF TITLE 12 TO PROVIDE THE PHYSICAL EXAMINATION AND
WRITTEN CLEARANCE FOR THE STUDENT TO PLAY OR PARTICIPATE.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-3- HB26-1231